Maryland, session 2026, HB0612.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
7.5–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(n) “Peer support services” means a set of nonclinical activities provided by
individuals in recovery from mental disorders, substance–related disorders, or addictive
disorders who use their personal, lived experiences and training to support other
individuals with mental disorders, substance–related disorders, or addictive disorders.
Article – Labor and Employment
11–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Department” means the Maryland Department of Labor.
11–903.
(a) The Department is responsible for the provision of education and workforce
skills training programs in the adult correctional institutions in the State.
(b) The Secretary shall appoint a Director of Education and Workforce Skills
Training for Correctional Institutions.
(c) The Director shall receive the salary provided in the budget of the
Department.
(d) The Director shall:
(1) implement and operate the educational and workforce skills training
programs developed by the Council in the correctional institutions;

HOUSE BILL 612 3
(2) meet with and advise the Council about the programs;
(3) consult with the Commissioner of Correction [and], the warden of each
institution, AND THE STATE CORRECTIONAL OMBUDSMAN, OR THE OMBUDSMAN’S
DESIGNEE, about the operation of the programs; and
(4) set qualification standards for teachers in workforce skills training
programs who are employed by the Department that are similar to the standards for
teachers providing CTE instruction in accordance with § 7–205.1 of the Education Article.
(e) Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, each teacher in an educational
and workforce skills training program who is employed by the Department is in the
professional service in the State Personnel Management System.
11–903.1.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “CERTIFIED PEER RECOVERY SPECIALIST” MEANS AN
INDIVIDUAL WHO HAS BEEN CERTIFIED FOR THE PURPOSE OF PROVIDING PEER
SUPPORT SERVICES.
(3) “CORRECTIONAL INSTITUTION” MEANS A PLACE OF DETENTION
OR CORRECTIONAL CONFINEMENT OPERATED BY OR FOR THE STATE.
(4) “INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS
ACTUALLY OR CONSTRUCTIVELY DETAINED OR CONFINED IN A CORRECTIONAL
INSTITUTION.
(5) “PEER SUPPORT SERVICES” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN §
7.5–101 OF THE HEALTH – GENERAL ARTICLE.
(6) “PROGRAM” MEANS THE CERTIFIED PEER RECOVERY
SPECIALIST TRAINING PROGRAM FOR INCARCERATED INDIVIDUALS.
(B) THERE IS A CERTIFIED PEER RECOVERY SPECIALIST TRAINING
PROGRAM FOR INCARCERATED INDIVIDUALS IN THE DEPARTMENT.
(C) THE PURPOSES OF THE PROGRAM ARE TO:
(1) PROVIDE FUNDS TO ESTABLISH AND MAINTAIN CERTIFIED PEER
RECOVERY SPECIALIST TRAINING FOR INCARCERATED INDIVIDUALS;

HOUSE BILL 612
(2) PROVIDE COMPENSATION FOR INCARCERATED INDIVIDUALS WHO
PARTICIPATE IN CERTIFIED PEER RECOVERY SPECIALIST TRAINING; AND
(3) PREPARE INCARCERATED INDIVIDUALS WHO PARTICIPATE IN
CERTIFIED PEER RECOVERY SPECIALIST TRAINING FOR POSTRELEASE
EMPLOYMENT IN BEHAVIORAL HEALTH AND COMMUNITY RECOVERY SERVICES.
(D) (1) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADMINISTER THE PROGRAM IN
CONSULTATION WITH THE DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC SAFETY AND CORRECTIONAL
SERVICES, THE MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH, AND THE MARYLAND
OFFICE OF OVERDOSE RESPONSE.
(2) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL CREATE AT LEAST ONE POSITION TO
PROVIDE CORRECTIONAL EDUCATION STAFF FOR THE PROGRAM TO:
(I) PROVIDE DIRECT SUPPORT TO CERTIFIED PEER RECOVERY
SPECIALIST TRAINEES;
(II) FACILITATE COMMUNICATION BETWEEN CORRECTIONAL
EDUCATION SCHOOLS AND THE CERTIFIED PEER RECOVERY SPECIALIST
SUPERVISORS; AND
(III) ASSIST WITH TRAINING, DATA MANAGEMENT, AND
CONSISTENT PROGRAM DELIVERY ACROSS CORRECTIONAL INSTITUTIONS.
(3) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL CREATE AT LEAST ONE POSITION FOR
THE PROGRAM TO PROVIDE SUPPORT TO THE CERTIFIED PEER RECOVERY
SPECIALISTS.
(E) (1) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2028 AND EACH FISCAL YEAR THEREAFTER,
THE GOVERNOR MAY INCLUDE IN THE ANNUAL BUDGET BILL AN APPROPRIATION
SUFFICIENT FOR THE OPERATION AND ADMINISTRATION OF THE PROGRAM.
(2) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL USE FUNDS APPROPRIATED IN THE
BUDGET FOR THE PROGRAM TO:
(I) SUPPORT THE POSITIONS REQUIRED UNDER THIS SECTION;
AND
(II) PROVIDE PROFESSIONAL DEVELOPMENT RESOURCES,
INCLUDING CONTINUING EDUCATION, CROSS–TRAININGS, AND PEER SUPERVISION
WORKSHOPS.

HOUSE BILL 612 5
(3) THE DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC SAFETY AND CORRECTIONAL
SERVICES SHALL USE FUNDS APPROPRIATED IN THE BUDGET FOR THE PROGRAM
TO:
(I) ENHANCE THE DAILY WAGE FOR INCARCERATED
INDIVIDUALS WHO PROVIDE CERTIFIED PEER RECOVERY SPECIALIST SERVICES;
AND
(II) PROVIDE PROFESSIONAL DEVELOPMENT RESOURCES,
INCLUDING CONTINUING EDUCATION, CROSS–TRAININGS, AND PEER SUPERVISION
WORKSHOPS.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.